bg-BG: Характеристики на разтегателната маса: Отделение за съхранение на аксесоари/инструменти; Регулируеми крака/нивелиращи крачета; Антивибрационен/стабилизиращ дизайн; Включен калъф за носене; Дръжка за носене; Изрез за кутия за аксесоари; Дизайн за лесно монтиране/бързо освобождаване; Сгъваеми крака; Линии на мрежата; Неплъзгащи се крачета; Оптимизирана повърхност за капитониране; Подвижна/регулируема вложка за свободен ръкав; Линийка/маркировки за измерване; Прозрачна секция/вложка; Други
zh-TW: 延伸桌功能: 配件/工具收納層; 可調式支腳/水平調整腳墊; 防震/穩定設計; 附提袋/收納盒; 提把; 配件盒開口; 易安裝/快拆設計; 摺疊支腳; 網格線; 防滑腳墊; 絎縫表面最佳化; 巧臂專用可拆/可調式嵌件; 尺/測量標記; 透明區塊/嵌件; 其他
sl-SI: Značilnosti raztezne mize: Predal za shranjevanje dodatkov/orodja; Nastavljive noge/izravnalne nogice; Antivibracijska/stabilizacijska zasnova; Vključena torba za prenašanje; Ročaj za prenašanje; Izrez za škatlo z dodatki; Zasnova za enostavno namestitev/hitro sprostitev; Zložljive noge; Mrežne črte; Nedrseče nogice; Optimizirana površina za prešivanje; Odstranljiv/nastavljiv vložek za prosto roko; Ravnilne/merilne oznake; Prozoren del/vložek; Drugo
tr: Uzatma masasının özellikleri: Aksesuar/alet saklama bölmesi; Ayarlanabilir ayaklar/dengeleme ayakları; Titreşim önleyici/dengeleyici tasarım; Taşıma çantası dahil; Taşıma sapı; Aksesuar kutusu için boşluk; Kolay kurulum/hızlı açılan tasarım; Katlanabilir ayaklar; Izgara çizgileri; Kaymaz ayaklar; Kapitone yüzeyi için optimize edilmiş; Serbest kol için çıkarılabilir/ayarlanabilir eklenti; Cetvel/ölçüm işaretleri; Şeffaf bölüm/eklenti; Diğer
th: คุณสมบัติของโต๊ะต่อขยาย: ช่องเก็บอุปกรณ์เสริม/เครื่องมือ; ขาปรับได้/ขาตั้งปรับระดับ; ดีไซน์กันสั่น/เสริมความมั่นคง; มีกระเป๋าพกพาให้; หูหิ้วพกพา; ช่องเจาะสำหรับกล่องอุปกรณ์เสริม; ดีไซน์ติดตั้งง่าย/ถอดออกเร็ว; ขาพับได้; เส้นกริด; ขาตั้งกันลื่น; พื้นผิวสำหรับงานควิลท์; ส่วนแทรกถอดได้/ปรับได้สำหรับฟรีอาร์ม; ไม้บรรทัด/เครื่องหมายวัดขนาด; ส่วนโปร่งใส/ส่วนแทรก; อื่นๆ
fr: Caractéristiques de la table d’extension: Compartiment de rangement pour accessoires/outils; Pieds réglables/de nivellement; Conception anti-vibrations/stabilisatrice; Étui de transport inclus; Poignée de transport; Découpe pour boîte à accessoires; Installation facile/fixation rapide; Pieds pliables; Lignes de grille; Pieds antidérapants; Surface optimisée pour courtepointe; Insert amovible/réglable pour bras libre; Règle/repères de mesure; Section/insert transparent; Autre
pl: Funkcje stołu rozsuwanego: Schowek na akcesoria/narzędzia; Regulowane nóżki / stopki poziomujące; Konstrukcja antywibracyjna / stabilizująca; Torba transportowa w zestawie; Uchwyt do przenoszenia; Wycięcie na pudełko z akcesoriami; Łatwy montaż / mechanizm szybkiego zwalniania; Składane nóżki; Linie siatki; Stopki antypoślizgowe; Optymalizowana powierzchnia do pikowania; Wyjmowana/regulowana wkładka na wolne ramię; Linijka / miarka; Przezroczysta sekcja / wkładka; Inne
zh-CN: 扩展桌功能: 配件/工具储物格; 可调节支脚/调平地脚; 防震/稳定设计; 包含便携包; 提手; 配件盒开孔; 易安装/快拆设计; 可折叠支脚; 网格线; 防滑垫脚; 优化了绗缝表面; 用于自由臂的可拆卸/可调节内嵌件; 标尺/测量标记; 透明部分/插页; 其他
hr-HR: Značajke stola za proširenje: Pretinac za pohranu pribora/alata; Podesive noge / noge za niveliranje; Dizajn protiv vibracija / za stabilizaciju; Uključena torba za nošenje; Ručka za nošenje; Izrez za kutiju s priborom; Dizajn za jednostavnu ugradnju / brzo otpuštanje; Sklopive noge; Mrežne linije; Noge protiv klizanja; Optimizirana površina za prošivanje; Uklonjivi/podesivi umetak za slobodni rukavac; Oznake ravnala / za mjerenje; Prozirni dio/umetak; Ostalo
nl: Aanschuiftafel functies: Opbergvak voor accessoires/gereedschap; Verstelbare poten/stelvoeten; Trillingsvrij/stabiliserend ontwerp; Inclusief draagtas; Draaggreep; Uitsparing voor accessoiredoos; Eenvoudig te installeren/snelsluitend ontwerp; Inklapbare poten; Rasterlijnen; Antislipvoetjes; Geoptimaliseerd voor quiltwerk; Verwijderbare/verstelbare inleg voor vrije arm; Liniaal/meetmarkeringen; Transparant gedeelte/inleg; Overig
hu: Hosszabbító asztal jellemzői: Tartozék-/szerszámtároló rekesz; Állítható lábak/szintezőtalpak; Rezgéscsillapító/stabilizáló kialakítás; Hordtáska mellékelve; Hordozófogantyú; Kivágás a tartozékdoboz számára; Könnyen telepíthető/gyorskioldós kialakítás; Összecsukható lábak; Rácsvonalak; Csúszásgátló talpak; Foltvarrásra optimalizált felület; Kivehető/állítható betét szabadkarhoz; Vonalzó/mérési jelölések; Átlátszó rész/betét; Egyéb
ko: 확장 테이블 기능: 액세서리/도구 보관함; 조절형 다리/수평 조절발; 진동 방지/안정화 디자인; 휴대용 케이스 포함; 운반용 손잡이; 액세서리 상자용 컷아웃; 간편 설치/빠른 분리 디자인; 접이식 다리; 그리드 선; 미끄럼 방지 발; 퀼팅 표면 최적화; 프리암용 탈착식/조절식 인서트; 눈금자/측정 표시; 투명 섹션/인서트; 기타
en: Extension table features: Accessory/tool storage compartment; Adjustable legs/leveling feet; Anti-vibration/stabilizing design; Carry case included; Carrying handle; Cutout for accessory box; Easy-install/quick-release design; Foldable legs; Grid lines; Non-slip feet; Quilting surface optimized; Removable/adjustable inset for free arm; Ruler/measurement markings; Transparent section/insert; Other
it: Caratteristiche del tavolo estensibile: Scomparto per accessori/strumenti; Gambe regolabili/piedini di livellamento; Design antivibrante/stabilizzante; Custodia per il trasporto inclusa; Maniglia per il trasporto; Ritaglio per scatola degli accessori; Design a installazione facile/sgancio rapido; Gambe pieghevoli; Linee della griglia; Piedini antiscivolo; Superficie ottimizzata per trapuntatura; Inserto rimovibile/regolabile per braccio libero; Righello/indicatori di misurazione; Sezione/inserto trasparente; Altro
cs: Vlastnosti rozkládacího stolu: Přihrádka na příslušenství/nástroje; Nastavitelné nohy / vyrovnávací nožky; Antivibrační/stabilizační provedení; Včetně přenosného pouzdra; Rukojeť pro přenášení; Výřez pro box s příslušenstvím; Snadná instalace / rychloupínací provedení; Sklopné nohy; Mřížka; Protiskluzové nožky; Optimalizováno pro quilting; Odnímatelná/nastavitelná vložka pro volné rameno; Pravítko / měřicí značky; Průhledná část/vložka; Jiné
fi: Jatkopöydän ominaisuudet: Säilytyslokero tarvikkeille/työkaluille; Säädettävät jalat / säätötassut; Tärinää vaimentava / vakauttava rakenne; Sisältää kantolaukun; Kantokahva; Aukko tarvikelaatikolle; Helposti asennettava / pikakiinnitteinen rakenne; Taittuvat jalat; Ruudukon viivat; Liukumattomat jalat; Optimoitu tikkauspinta; Irrotettava/säädettävä upotus vapaavarrelle; Viivain/mittamerkinnät; Läpinäkyvä osa/upotus; Muu
nb: Funksjoner for forlengelsesbord: Oppbevaringsrom for tilbehør/verktøy; Justerbare ben / nivelleringsføtter; Antivibrerende/stabiliserende design; Bæreveske inkludert; Bærehåndtak; Utskjæring for tilbehørsboks; Enkel montering / hurtigkoblingsdesign; Sammenleggbare ben; Rutenettlinjer; Sklisikre føtter; Optimalisert for quilting; Avtakbar/justerbar innsats for friarm; Linjal / målemarkeringer; Gjennomsiktig seksjon/innsats; Annet
pt-BR: Características da mesa extensora: Compartimento de armazenamento de acessórios/ferramentas; Pernas ajustáveis/pés de nivelamento; Design antivibração/estabilizador; Estojo de transporte incluído; Alça de transporte; Recorte para caixa de acessórios; Design de fácil instalação/liberação rápida; Pernas dobráveis; Linhas de grade; Pés antiderrapantes; Superfície otimizada para quilting; Encaixe removível/ajustável para braço livre; Régua/marcações de medição; Seção/inserção transparente; Outros
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale mesei extensibile: Compartiment de depozitare pentru accesorii/unelte; Picioare reglabile/de nivelare; Design anti-vibrații/stabilizator; Cutie de transport inclusă; Mâner de transport; Decupaj pentru cutia cu accesorii; Design cu instalare ușoară/eliberare rapidă; Picioare pliabile; Linii de grilă; Picioare antiderapante; Suprafață optimizată pentru quilting; Inserție detașabilă/reglabilă pentru braț liber; Marcaje de măsurare/riglă; Secțiune/inserție transparentă; Altele
sv: Funktioner för förlängningsbord: Förvaringsfack för tillbehör/verktyg; Justerbara ben/nivåfötter; Vibrationsdämpande/stabiliserande design; Bärväska ingår; Bärhandtag; Utskärning för tillbehörslåda; Lättinstallerad design med snabbfäste; Fällbara ben; Rutnätslinjer; Halkfria fötter; Optimerad för quiltning; Avtagbar/justerbar insats för friarm; Linjal/måttmarkeringar; Genomskinlig del/insats; Övrigt
sk-SK: Funkcie vysunovacieho stola: Úložný priestor na príslušenstvo/nástroje; Nastaviteľné nohy/vyrovnávacie nožičky; Antivibračný/stabilizačný dizajn; Vrátane prenosného puzdra; Rukoväť na prenášanie; Výrez pre skrinku s príslušenstvom; Dizajn pre jednoduchú inštaláciu/rýchle uvoľnenie; Sklopné nohy; Čiary mriežky; Protišmykové nožičky; Optimalizovaný povrch na prešívanie; Odnímateľná/nastaviteľná vložka pre voľné rameno; Pravítko/značky merania; Priehľadná časť/vložka; Iné
lt-LT: Prailginamo stalo savybės: Priedų / įrankių laikymo skyrius; Reguliuojamos kojelės / išlyginimo kojelės; Antivibracinė / stabilizuojanti konstrukcija; Pridedamas nešiojimo krepšys; Nešiojimo rankena; Išpjova priedų dėžutei; Lengvo montavimo / greito atleidimo konstrukcija; Sulankstomos kojos; Tinklelio linijos; Neslystančios kojelės; Optimizuotas dygsniavimo paviršius; Nuimamas / reguliuojamas įdėklas laisvai rankovei; Liniuotė / matavimo žymos; Skaidri dalis / įdėklas; Kita
de: Merkmale des Erweiterungstisches: Zubehör-/Werkzeug-Staufach; Verstellbare Beine/Nivellierfüße; Vibrationshemmendes/stabilisierendes Design; Inklusive Tragetasche; Tragegriff; Aussparung für Zubehörbox; Einfache Installation/Schnellspanner-Design; Klappbare Beine; Rasterlinien; Rutschfeste Füße; Optimierte Quilt-Oberfläche; Abnehmbarer/verstellbarer Einsatz für Freiarm; Lineal-/Messmarkierungen; Transparenter Abschnitt/Einsatz; Sonstiges
ru: Функции удлинительного стола: Отсек для аксессуаров/инструментов; Регулируемые ножки/выравнивающие опоры; Антивибрационная/стабилизирующая конструкция; Чехол в комплекте; Ручка для переноски; Вырез для коробки с аксессуарами; Быстросъемная/легко устанавливаемая конструкция; Складные ножки; Линии сетки; Нескользящие ножки; Оптимизированная поверхность для квилтинга; Съемная/регулируемая вставка для свободного рукава; Линейка/измерительная разметка; Прозрачная секция/вставка; Другое
vi: Đặc điểm bàn mở rộng: Ngăn chứa phụ kiện/công cụ; Chân có thể điều chỉnh/chân chỉnh thăng bằng; Thiết kế chống rung/ổn định; Đi kèm hộp đựng; Tay xách; Phần cắt rỗng cho hộp phụ kiện; Thiết kế dễ lắp/tháo nhanh; Chân gập; Đường lưới; Chân chống trượt; Bề mặt chần bông được tối ưu hóa; Phần đệm tháo rời/điều chỉnh được cho trụ may; Thước/vạch đo; Phần/miếng lót trong suốt; Khác
pt-PT: Características da mesa extensível: Compartimento de arrumação de acessórios/ferramentas; Pernas ajustáveis/pés de nivelamento; Design antivibração/estabilizador; Mala de transporte incluída; Pega de transporte; Recorte para caixa de acessórios; Design de instalação fácil/libertação rápida; Pernas dobráveis; Linhas de grelha; Pés antiderrapantes; Superfície otimizada para acolchoamento; Inserção amovível/ajustável para braço livre; Régua/marcações de medição; Secção/inserção transparente; Outro
ja: 拡張テーブル機能: アクセサリー/ツール収納コンパートメント; 調整可能な脚/アジャスター; 防振/安定化デザイン; キャリングケース付き; 持ち手; アクセサリーボックス用カットアウト; 簡単取り付け/クイックリリースデザイン; 折りたたみ脚; グリッド線; 滑り止め付きの脚; キルティングに最適化された表面; フリーアーム用の取り外し/調整可能なインセット; 定規/目盛り; 透明なセクション/インサート; その他
es: Características de la mesa de extensión: Compartimento para guardar accesorios o herramientas; Patas ajustables/niveladoras; Diseño antivibración/estabilizador; Estuche de transporte incluido; Asa de transporte; Recorte para caja de accesorios; Diseño de instalación fácil/liberación rápida; Patas plegables; Líneas de cuadrícula; Pies antideslizantes; Superficie de acolchado optimizada; Inserto extraíble/ajustable para brazo libre; Regla/marcas de medición; Sección/inserto transparente; Otra
da: Forlængerbordets egenskaber: Opbevaringsrum til tilbehør/værktøj; Justerbare ben/stillefødder; Antivibrations-/stabiliserende design; Bæretaske medfølger; Bærehåndtag; Udskæring til tilbehørsæske; Design til nem montering/hurtig frigørelse; Foldbare ben; Gitterlinjer; Skridsikre fødder; Optimeret quiltningsoverflade; Aftagelig/justerbar indsats til friarm; Lineal-/målemarkeringer; Gennemsigtig sektion/indsats; Andet
el: Χαρακτηριστικά τραπεζιού προέκτασης: Χώρος αποθήκευσης αξεσουάρ/εργαλείων; Ρυθμιζόμενα πόδια/πόδια αλφαδιάσματος; Αντικραδασμικός/σταθεροποιητικός σχεδιασμός; Περιλαμβάνεται θήκη μεταφοράς; Λαβή μεταφοράς; Εγκοπή για κουτί αξεσουάρ; Εύκολη εγκατάσταση/Σχεδιασμός γρήγορης απασφάλισης; Αναδιπλούμενα πόδια; Γραμμές πλέγματος; Αντιολισθητικά πόδια; Βελτιστοποιημένη επιφάνεια καπιτονέ; Αφαιρούμενο/ρυθμιζόμενο ένθετο για ελεύθερο βραχίονα; Χάρακας/ενδείξεις μέτρησης; Διαφανές τμήμα/ένθετο; Άλλο